Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB514.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 100 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For purposes of this section unless context otherwise requires:
(a) "Affordable housing development" means a proposed or existing structure,
or group of structures, in which all single-family or multifamily residential
dwelling units within the development are set aside for or are occupied by
low-income households at a rent amount that does not exceed thirty percent
(30%) of the income limit for the low-income housing unit;
(b) "Low-income household" means a single person, family, or unrelated
persons living together whose adjusted income is less than eighty percent
(80%) of the median family income, adjusted for household size, for the
area where the affordable housing development is located as set out by the
United States Department of Housing and Urban Development;
(c) "Religious developer" means a religious institution or any property
developer working contractually on behalf of a religious institution, but
shall not include any developer that owes outstanding amounts to the local
government as the result of fines resulting from ordinance violations, has
an active lien placed by the local government on property owned by the
institution, or is actively committing any ordinance violation; and
(d) "Religious institution" means a bona fide church, religious denomination,
or religious organization, determined by the Internal Revenue Service to be
tax exempt pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(2) In an area that has adopted zoning regulations, an affordable housing
development that is developed by a religious developer shall be permitted in all
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/12/2025 4:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 359
zones that allow for residential use and shall be subject only to a ministerial
review by a planning unit for compliance with this subsection and subsection (3)
of this section, if the following conditions are met:
(a) The development is located on property owned by a religious institution
beginning from a date at least two (2) years prior to the time of application
to the planning unit, and then throughout the duration of the obligation in
paragraph (c) of this subsection;
(b) The development exclusively contains affordable housing units for low-
income households. This requirement shall not apply to dwellings
associated with the primary use of the religious institution;
(c) The obligation to provide dwelling units meeting the requirements of this
section shall last for a period of ten (10) years from the date of the
certificate of occupancy or, if a certificate of occupancy is not required,
from the date of the final building permit inspection. This obligation shall
be recorded in a legally binding agreement or deed restriction, and a report
shall be submitted annually to the certifying planning unit that the
requirements of this section are met for the property;
(d) The development contains twenty-five (25) or fewer units;
(e) The development would not lead to more than twenty-five (25) affordable
housing units being located on that parcel, any contiguous parcel owned by
the religious institution, or cumulatively on parcels owned by the religious
institution within one-half (1/2) mile of the development; and
(f) The religious developer has obtained all other permits, including building
permits, as required by law.
(3) (a) If the zoning regulations adopted in the jurisdiction where an affordable
housing development established pursuant to this section include design
requirements such as size, width, height, and location of structures for
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/12/2025 4:59 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 359
residential developments, the affordable housing development shall comply
with those design requirements.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the religious developer
may apply for a variance from one (1) or more of those design requirements
from the planning unit. The planning unit shall be empowered to hear and
finally decide an application consistent with KRS 100.241 and 100.243.
(4) If an affordable housing development established pursuant to this section no
longer meets the requirements in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
property owner shall seek all approvals for the development from the planning
unit that would be required for a developer that did not utilize the provisions of
this section.
(5) A religious institution may propose an affordable housing development that does
not meet the requirements in subsection (2)(e) of this section, but otherwise meets
the requirements in subsections (2) and (3) of this section. An affordable housing
development proposed under this subsection shall require a public meeting, with
final approval by the planning commission.
(6) The Kentucky Housing Corporation may provide technical and advisory
resources to a religious developer to assist with the development and management
of an affordable housing development under this section.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/12/2025 4:59 PM Jacketed